Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 4. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 64.2-1640.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among the states that enact it.

History.

2010, cc. 455, 632, § 26-114; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For article, “Medical Malpractice Law,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 319 (2010).

§ 64.2-1641.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.), but does not modify, limit, or supersede § 101(c) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(c)) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in § 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7003(b)).

History.

2010, cc. 455, 632, § 26-115; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-1642.
Effect on existing powers of attorney.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, on July 1, 2010:

This chapter applies to a power of attorney created before, on, or after July 1, 2010;

This chapter applies to a judicial proceeding concerning a power of attorney commenced on or after July 1, 2010;

This chapter applies to a judicial proceeding concerning a power of attorney commenced before July 1, 2010, unless the court finds that application of a provision of this chapter would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceeding or prejudice the rights of a party, in which case that provision does not apply and the superseded law applies; and

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an act done before July 1, 2010, is not affected by this chapter.

History.

2010, cc. 455, 632, § 26-116; 2012, c. 614.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14B M.J. Powers, § 2.